South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions contained in Section 7-13-15 relating to when primary elections are held, the primary for the 2026 General Election shall be conducted on the second Tuesday in August following the same procedures outlined in Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code. SECTION 2.  Notwithstanding the provisions contained in Section 7-11-15 relating to the qualifications to run as a candidate in the general election, the filing period for the political party primary in August must be opened at noon on the third Friday in June for a period to close five days later at noon. All candidates who have already filed for the 2026 primary must refile to participate in the August primaries. SECTION 3.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----